Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
(1) The Oregon Criminal Justice Commission shall study, track and  account
for all public moneys appropriated for and expended on the provision of alcohol and  drug
treatment.
(2) The commission shall, when performing the study described in subsection (1)  of this
section, examine:
(a) Treatment provided by state agencies and other public entities;
(b) Treatment provided by private entities through contracts with public entities; and
(c) Outcomes of each type of treatment and, specifically,  the effect of outcomes on the
criminal justice system.
(3) The Oregon Health  Authority, the Department of Human Services, the Department
of Corrections and the Oregon  Youth Authority shall assist the commission in the perform-
ance of the study described in this section and, to the extent permitted  by laws relating to
confidentiality, furnish information the commission considers  necessary to perform the
study.
(4) The commission shall submit a report detailing the results  of the study to the interim
committees of  the Legislative Assembly related to the judiciary in the manner provided by
ORS 192.245 no later than September 15, 2019.
SECTION 2.
In addition to and not in lieu of any other appropriation,  there is appropri-
ated to the Oregon Criminal Justice Commission, for the biennium beginning July 1, 2017,
out of the General Fund, the amount  of $284,344, which may be expended for the purpose of
carrying out the provisions of this 2017 Act.
SECTION 3.
This 2017 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency  is declared to exist, and this 2017 Act takes effect
on its passage.
Enrolled Senate Bill 1041 (SB 1041-A) Page 1
Passed by Senate July 1, 2017
..................................................................................
Lori L. Brocker, Secretary of Senate
..................................................................................
Peter Courtney, President of Senate
Passed by House July 6, 2017
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Speaker of House
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2017
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2017
..................................................................................
Kate Brown, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2017
..................................................................................
Dennis Richardson, Secretary of State
Enrolled Senate Bill 1041 (SB 1041-A) Page 2